Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-365
Operation of
vehicle without registration; limitation; proof of ownership.

Any person purchasing a motor vehicle or trailer in this
state other than from a licensed dealer in motor vehicles or trailers shall
not operate or tow such motor vehicle or trailer in this state without registration
except as provided in this section. Such purchaser may operate or tow such
motor vehicle or trailer without registration for a period not to exceed thirty
days. Upon demand of proper authorities, there shall be presented by the person
in charge of such motor vehicle or trailer, for examination, a bill of sale showing the date of transfer or
the certificate of title to such motor vehicle or trailer with assignment
thereof duly executed. When such motor vehicle or trailer is purchased from
a nonresident, the person in charge of such motor vehicle or trailer shall
present upon demand proper evidence of ownership from the state where such
motor vehicle or trailer was purchased.

Laws
2005, LB 274, § 65;

Laws 2008, LB756, § 11;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 12.

Pursuant
to this section, one can lawfully operate an unregistered motor vehicle for
30 days without display of license plates or in-transit tags after purchasing
the vehicle from a nonlicensed seller, provided one can produce the proper
documentation upon demand. State v. Bowers, 250 Neb. 151, 548 N.W.2d 725 (1996).